Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1828
Application of act.

The Civil Service Act shall apply to all municipalities, as defined in section 19-1826, in the State of Nebraska specified in subsection (1) of section 19-1827. All present full-time firefighters and full-time police officers of such municipalities and future appointees to such full-time positions shall be subject to civil service.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 2, p. 127;

R.S.1943, § 19-1802;

Laws 1957, c. 48, § 2, p. 230;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1802;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 7.